Indiana, session 2026, HB1403.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 5-20-11 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]:
Chapter 11. First Time Home Buyer Savings Program
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "account holder" means a first
time home buyer who establishes a first time home buyer savings
account.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "authority" refers to the Indiana
housing and community development authority created by
IC 5-20-1-3.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "eligible costs" means:
(1) the down payment; and
(2) any allowable closing costs listed as disbursements on a
settlement statement;
for the purchase of a single family residence by an account holder.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "financial institution" means a
bank, savings association, credit union, or any other institution
2026 IN 1403—LS 7057/DI 129


regulated under IC 28 or federal law that has a physical location
in Indiana.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "first time home buyer" means
an individual who is an Indiana resident and has not owned or
purchased, either individually or jointly, a single family residence
during a period of three (3) years before the date of the purchase
of a single family residence.
Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "first time home buyer savings
account" means an account established as a first time home buyer
savings account by written agreement between an account holder
and a financial institution and that the account holder designates
for the purpose of paying or reimbursing eligible costs for the
purchase of a single family residence in Indiana by the account
holder.
Sec. 7. As used in this chapter, "program" refers to the first
time home buyer savings program established by section 10 of this
chapter.
Sec. 8. As used in this chapter, "settlement statement" means
the statement of receipts and disbursements for a transaction
related to real estate, including a statement prescribed under the
federal Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act (12 U.S.C. 2601 et
seq.) and related regulations.
Sec. 9. As used in this chapter, "single family residence" means
any residence intended for occupation by a single family unit that
is owned and occupied by an account holder as the account
holder's principal residence.
Sec. 10. The first time home buyer savings program is
established for the purpose of assisting first time home buyers who
seek to open an account at a financial institution to save money for
the purchase of a single family residence. The authority shall
administer the program and prepare and supervise the issuance of
public information concerning the program, including information
pertaining to the availability of the tax credit provided by
IC 6-3-3-14.
Sec. 11. A financial institution may participate in the program
and offer first time home buyer savings accounts. However,
nothing in this chapter requires a financial institution to offer first
time home buyer savings accounts to customers of the financial
institution.
Sec. 12. Not later than January 1, 2027, the authority shall
prescribe an informational form that a financial institution may
use to provide to customers that summarizes the eligibility
2026 IN 1403—LS 7057/DI 129


requirements of the program, the eligible costs that may be paid
from a first time home buyer savings account, and the availability
of the tax credit for contributions provided by IC 6-3-3-14.
Sec. 13. The authority shall also prescribe a form for use by a
financial institution at which an account holder has created a first
time home buyer savings account that contains the following
information:
(1) The date when the account was created.
(2) The name of the account holder.
(3) The amount of funds contributed to the account during the
taxable year.
(4) The amount of funds withdrawn from the account during
the taxable year.
(5) Any other information the authority considers necessary.
A financial institution that offers first time home buyer savings
accounts must annually provide the information contained on the
form to an account holder before January 31 of each year.
Sec. 14. An individual may jointly own a first time home buyer
savings account with another person if the joint account holders
are both first time home buyers and file a joint income tax return.
However, an individual may not be the account holder of more
than one (1) first time home buyer savings account.
Sec. 15. An account holder may not use funds held in a first time
home buyer savings account to pay expenses of administering the
account, except that the financial institution that administers the
account may deduct a service fee from the account.
Sec. 16. An account holder may withdraw all or part of the
funds from a first time home buyer savings account and deposit the
funds in a new first time home buyer savings account held by a
different financial institution or the same financial institution.
Sec. 17. A financial institution is not required to track the use of
funds withdrawn from a first time home buyer savings account,
and is not responsible or liable for:
(1) determining or ensuring that an account satisfies the
requirements to be a first time home buyer savings account;
(2) determining or ensuring that funds in a first time home
buyer savings account are used for eligible costs; or
(3) reporting or remitting taxes related to the use of a first
time home buyer savings account.
Sec. 18. A first time home buyer savings account and all
earnings or interest on an account are exempt from taxation in
Indiana. In addition, withdrawals from an account used to pay
2026 IN 1403—LS 7057/DI 129


eligible costs are exempt from the adjusted gross income tax
imposed by IC 6-3-1 through IC 6-3-7.
Sec. 19. The authority may adopt policies, procedures, or other
guidelines that it considers necessary for the implementation of the
program.
SECTION 2. IC 6-3-3-14 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 14. (a) The following definitions apply
throughout this section:
(1) "Account holder" has the meaning set forth in
IC 5-20-11-1.
(2) "Contribution" means the amount of money directly
provided to a first time home buyer savings account by a
taxpayer.
(3) "Eligible costs" has the meaning set forth in IC 5-20-11-3.
(4) "First time home buyer savings account" has the meaning
set forth in IC 5-20-11-6.
(5) "Taxpayer" means:
(A) an individual filing a single return;
(B) a married couple filing a joint return; or
(C) a married individual filing a separate return.
(b) A taxpayer is entitled to a credit against the taxpayer's
adjusted gross income tax imposed by IC 6-3-1 through IC 6-3-7
for a taxable year equal to the lesser of:
(1) twenty percent (20%) multiplied by the amount of the
total contributions that are made by the taxpayer to the
taxpayer's first time home buyer savings account during the
taxable year; or
(2) five thousand dollars ($5,000).
(c) A taxpayer is not entitled to a carryback, carryover, or
refund of an unused credit.
(d) A taxpayer may not sell, assign, convey, or otherwise
transfer the tax credit provided by this section.
(e) To receive the credit provided by this section, a taxpayer
must claim the credit on the taxpayer's annual state tax return or
returns in the manner prescribed by the department. The taxpayer
shall submit to the department all information that the department
determines is necessary for the calculation of the credit provided
by this section.
(f) An account holder must repay all or a part of the credit in a
taxable year in which the taxpayer withdraws funds from a first
time home buyer savings account if the funds were:
2026 IN 1403—LS 7057/DI 129


(1) used for a purpose other than an eligible cost;
(2) claimed as a credit in the taxable year or a prior taxable
year; and
(3) not deposited into another first time home buyer savings
account held by the taxpayer.
(g) Any required repayment under subsection (f) shall be
reported by the account holder on the account holder's annual
state income tax return for any taxable year in which an account
holder withdraws funds for a purpose other than the payment of
eligible costs.
(h) A person other than the account holder who deposits funds
in a first time home buyer savings account is not entitled to the
credit provided by this section.
SECTION 3. [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027] (a) IC 6-3-3-14,
as added by this act, applies to taxable years beginning after
December 31, 2026.
(b) This SECTION expires December 31, 2029.
2026 IN 1403—LS 7057/DI 129